Tennessee, session 114, SB1015.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 37-2-415(e), is amended by deleting
the language:
All current employees shall receive such training no later than February 1, 2010, and
new employees shall be trained within thirty (30) days from the date of their employment.
and substituting:
New employees must receive such training within thirty (30) days from the date of their
employment.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1015
003221
- 1 -